North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-298.
Hazardous waste fund.

A nonreverting hazardous waste fund is established within the Department which shall be available to defray the cost to the State for monitoring and care of hazardous waste disposal facilities after the termination of the period during which the facility
operator is required by applicable State and federal statutes, rules or regulations to remain responsible for post-closure monitoring and care. The establishment of this fund shall in no way be construed to relieve or reduce the liability
of facility operators or any persons for damages caused by the facility. The fund shall be maintained by fees collected pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 130A-294(a)(6).

History.
1981, c. 704, s. 7; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 168, s. 25.

§ 130A-299.
Single agency designation.

The Department is designated as the single State agency for purposes of RCRA or any State or federal legislation enacted to promote the proper management of solid waste.

History.
1969, c. 899; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 168, s. 26.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

As to North Carolina prohibition of the dumping of waste materials such as bags of medical refuse,
especially that which may be hazardous or infectious, into the Atlantic Ocean, the authority of North Carolina with respect to dumping beyond three miles in the ocean which results in wastes entering State waters or being
deposited on the State shores and the extent State law applies to such events and what departments are responsible for enforcing such laws. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Robert B. Jordan, III, Lieutenant Governor, 58 N.C.
Op. Att'y Gen. 57 (1988).

§ 130A-300.
Effect on laws applicable to water pollution control.

This Article shall not be construed as amending, repealing or in any manner abridging or interfering with those sections of the General Statutes of North Carolina relative to the control of water pollution as now administered by the Commission nor shall
the provisions of this Article be construed as being applicable to or in any way affecting the authority of the Commission to control the discharges of wastes to the waters of the State as provided in Articles 21 and 21A, Chapter 143
of the General Statutes.

History.
1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2014-122, s. 11(d).

§ 130A-301.
Recordation of permits for disposal of waste on land and Notice of Open Dump.

Whenever the Department approves a permit for a sanitary landfill or a facility for the disposal of hazardous waste on land, the owner of the facility shall be granted both an original permit and a copy certified by the Secretary. The permit shall include
a legal description of the site that would be sufficient as a description in an instrument of conveyance.

The owner of a facility granted a permit for a sanitary landfill or a facility for the disposal of hazardous waste on land shall file the certified copy of the permit in the office of the register of deeds in the county or counties in which the land is
located.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.17, effective July 1, 2012.

The permit shall not be effective unless the certified copy is filed as required under subsection (b) of this section.

When a sanitary landfill or a facility for the disposal of hazardous waste on land is sold, leased, conveyed or transferred, the deed or other instrument of transfer shall contain in the description section in no smaller type than that used in the body
of the deed or instrument a statement that the property has been used as a sanitary landfill or a disposal site for hazardous waste and a reference by book and page to the recordation of the permit.

When the Department determines that an open dump exists, the Department shall notify the owner or operator of the open dump of applicable requirements to take remedial action at the site of the open dump to protect public health and the environment. If
the owner or operator fails to take remedial action, the Department may record a Notice of Open Dump in the office of the register of deeds in the county or counties where the open dump is located. Not less than 30 days before
recording the Notice of Open Dump, the Department shall notify the owner or operator of its intention to file a Notice of Open Dump. The Department may notify the owner or operator of its intention to file a Notice of Open Dump
at the time it notifies the owner or operator of applicable requirements to take remedial action. An owner or operator may challenge a decision of the Department to file a Notice of Open Dump by filing a contested case under Article
3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If an owner or operator challenges a decision of the Department to file a Notice of Open Dump, the Department shall not file the Notice of Open Dump until the contested case is resolved,
but may file a notice of pending litigation under Article 11 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. This power is additional and supplemental to any other power granted to the Department. This subsection does not repeal or supersede
any statute or rule requiring or authorizing record notice by the owner.

The Department shall file the Notice of Open Dump in the office of the register of deeds in substantially the following form:

Click to view

The description of the particular area where the open dump is located shall be based on the best information available to the Department but need not be a survey plat that meets the requirements of

G.S. 47-30

unless a survey plat that meets those requirements and that is approved by the Department is furnished by the owner or operator.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.17, effective July 1, 2012.

When the owner removes all solid waste from the open dump site to the satisfaction of the Department, the Department shall file a Cancellation of the Notice of Open Dump. The Cancellation shall be in a form similar to the original Notice of Open Dump
and shall state that all the solid waste that constituted the open dump has been removed to the satisfaction of the Department.

“NOTICE OF OPEN DUMP The Division of Waste Management of the North Carolina Department of Environmental Quality has determined that an open dump exists on the property described below. The Department provides the following information regarding this open
dump as a public service. This Notice is filed pursuant to . G.S. 130A-301(f) Name(s) of the record owner(s): Description of the real property: Description of the particular area where the open dump is located: Any person who has questions
regarding this Notice should contact the Division of Waste Management of the North Carolina Department of Environmental Quality. The contact person for this Notice is: who may be reached by telephone at or by mail at . Requests for
inspection and copying of public records regarding this open dump may be directed to who may be reached by telephone at or by mail at . Secretary of Environmental Quality by Date: .”

History.
1973, c. 444; c. 476, s. 128; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1981, c. 480, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-330, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(b); 2012-18, s. 1.17; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v).

§ 130A-301.1.
Land clearing and inert debris landfills with a disposal area of 1/2 acre or less; recordation.

No landfill for the on-site disposal of land clearing and inert debris shall, at the time the landfill is sited, be sited 50 feet or less from a boundary of an adjacent property.

The owner of a landfill for the on-site disposal of land clearing and inert debris shall file a certified copy of a survey of the property on which the landfill is located in the register of deeds’ office in the county in which the property is located,
which survey shall accurately show the location of the landfill and the record owner of the land on which the landfill is situated.

Prior to the lease or conveyance of any lot or tract of land which directly abuts or is contiguous to the disposal area used for land clearing and inert debris, the owner of the lot or tract shall prepare a document disclosing that a portion of the property
has been used as a disposal area for land clearing and inert debris or has been used to meet applicable minimum buffer requirements. The disclosure shall include a legal description of the property that would be sufficient in an
instrument of conveyance and shall be filed in the register of deeds office prior to any lease or conveyance.

No public, commercial, or residential building shall be located or constructed on the property, or any portion of the property on which the landfill for the on-site disposal of land clearing and inert debris is located, 50 feet or less from the landfill.
Construction of such buildings, with the exception of site preparation and foundation work, shall not commence until after closure of the on-site land clearing and inert debris landfill.

Source reduction methods including, but not limited to, chipping and mulching of land clearing and inert debris shall be utilized to the maximum degree technically and economically feasible.

The Department of Transportation is exempt from subsections (b) and (c) of this section for the on-site disposal of land clearing and inert debris on highway rights-of-way.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 580, s. 2.

§ 130A-301.2.

Expired September 30, 2003, pursuant to Session Laws 1995, c. 502, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws 2001-357, s. 2.

§ 130A-301.3.
Disposal of demolition debris generated from the decommissioning of manufacturing buildings, including electric generating stations, on-site.

A person may dispose of demolition debris from the decommissioning of manufacturing buildings, including electric generating stations, on the same site as the decommissioned buildings if the demolition debris meets all of the following requirements:

It is composed only of inert debris such as brick or other masonry materials, dirt, sand, gravel, rock, and concrete if the material, when characterized using the toxicity characteristic leaching procedure developed by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency, is not a hazardous waste. The debris may contain small amounts of wood, paint, sealants, and metal associated with the inert debris.

It does not extend beyond the footprint of the decommissioned buildings and shall be at least 50 feet from the property boundary or enclosed by the walls of the building that are left in place below grade. Walls left in place below grade are not subject
to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection.

It is placed at least 500 feet from the nearest drinking water well.

It is placed to assure at least two feet of clean soil between any coated inert debris and the seasonal high groundwater table. Uncoated inert debris may be used as fill anywhere within the footprint of the decommissioned building or as beneficial fill
on the site.

It complies with all other applicable federal, State, and local laws, regulations, rules, and ordinances.

After the decommissioning is completed or terminated, the owner or operator shall compact the demolition debris and cover it with at least two feet of compacted earth finer than a sandy texture soil. The cover of the demolition debris shall be graded
so as to minimize water infiltration, promote proper drainage, and control erosion. Erosion of the cover shall be controlled by establishing suitable vegetative cover. All site stabilization should be completed within 90 days of
the completed demolition.

Within 30 days of completing the final site stabilization or at least 30 days before the land, or any interest in the land, on which the demolition debris is located is transferred, whichever is earlier, the owner or owners of record of the land on which
the demolition debris is located shall file each of the following with the register of deeds of the county in which the demolition debris is located:

A survey plat of the property that meets the requirements of

G.S. 47-30

. The plat shall accurately show the location of the demolition debris in a manner that will allow the demolition debris disposal site to be accurately delineated and shall reference this section.

A notice that disposal of demolition debris has been located on the land. The notice shall include a description of the land that would be sufficient as a description in an instrument of conveyance. The notice shall list the owners of record of the land
at the time the notice is filed and shall reference the book and page number where the deed or other instrument by which the owners of record acquired title is located. The notice shall reference the book and page number
where the survey plat required by subdivision (1) of this subsection is recorded. The notice shall reference this section, shall describe with particularity the type and size of the building or other structure that was
demolished, and shall state the dates on which the demolition began and ended. The notice shall be executed by the owner or owners of record as provided in Chapter 47 of the General Statutes. The register of deeds shall
record the notice and index it in the grantor index under the names of all owners of record of the land.

A certified copy of both the plat and notice required by subsection (c) of this section shall also be filed with the Department. The plat and the notice shall indicate on the face of the document the book and page number where recorded.

When the land, or any portion of the land, on which the demolition debris is located is sold, leased, conveyed, or transferred, the deed or other instrument of transfer shall contain a statement that the property has been used for the disposal of demolition
debris. The statement shall include a reference to this section and to the book and page number where the notice required by subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section is recorded.

History.
2013-55, s. 2.

§ 130A-302.
Sludge deposits at sanitary landfills.

Sludges generated by the treatment of wastewater discharges which are point sources subject to permits granted under Section 402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (P.L. 92-500), or permits generated under

G.S. 143-215.1

by the Commission shall not be deposited in or on a sanitary landfill permitted under this Article unless in a compliance with the rules concerning solid waste adopted under this Article.

History.
1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2014-122, s. 11(e).

§ 130A-303.
Imminent hazard; emergency.

The judgment of the Secretary that an imminent hazard exists concerning solid waste shall be supported by findings of fact made by the Secretary.

In order to eliminate an imminent hazard, the Secretary may, without notice or hearing, issue an order requiring that immediate action be taken to protect the public health or the environment. This order may be directed to a generator or transporter of
solid waste or to the owner or operator of a solid waste management facility. Where the imminent hazard is caused by an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, the Secretary shall follow the procedures set forth in

G.S. 130A-310.5

.

When a state of emergency, as defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3

, has been declared by the Governor due to a natural disaster such as a pandemic, epidemic, hurricane or flood, or due to a pending disaster, the Secretary, or an authorized representative of the Secretary, may,
upon request of a public or private landfill operator, or on the Secretary’s own initiative, develop and implement any emergency measures and procedures that the Secretary deems necessary for the proper management of solid waste
generated during the declared emergency. All State agencies and political subdivisions of the State shall cooperate with the implementation of the emergency measures and procedures developed pursuant to this section. Such emergency
procedures and measures may include any of the following: (i) restrictions on the collection, storage, and transportation of solid waste, (ii) decisions on facility operational conditions such as operational times and waste acceptance,
and (iii) any other measures or procedures necessary to allow for the proper disposal of solid waste within impacted communities. Written notice of emergency measures and procedures developed and implemented pursuant to this subsection
shall be provided to news media, waste organizations, governmental agencies, solid waste facilities, and any other interested or affected parties as determined by the Secretary. Emergency measures and procedures developed and implemented
pursuant to this section shall expire no more than 60 days after a declaration of a state of emergency has expired or been rescinded by the Governor.

History.
1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1981, c. 704, s. 7; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 574, s. 3; 2009-570, s. 27; 2020-74, s. 3.

§ 130A-304.
Confidential information protected.

The following information received or prepared by the Department in the course of carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this Article is confidential information and shall not be subject to disclosure under

G.S. 132-6

:

Information which the Secretary determines is entitled to confidential treatment pursuant to

G.S. 132-1.2

. If the Secretary determines that information received by the Department is not entitled to confidential treatment, the Secretary shall inform the person who provided the information of that determination
at the time such determination is made. The Secretary may refuse to accept or may return any information that is claimed to be confidential that the Secretary determines is not entitled to confidential treatment.

Information that is confidential under any provision of federal or state law.

Information compiled in anticipation of enforcement or criminal proceedings, but only to the extent disclosure could reasonably be expected to interfere with the institution of such proceedings.

Confidential information may be disclosed to officers, employees, or authorized representatives of federal or state agencies if such disclosure is necessary to carry out a proper function of the Department or the requesting agency or when relevant in
any proceeding under this Article.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section or as otherwise provided by law, any officer or employee of the State who knowingly discloses information designated as confidential under this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and shall
be removed from office or discharged from employment.

History.
1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 738, s. 5; 1987, c. 282, s. 20; 1991, c. 745, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 951; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Department of Environment and Natural Resources staff should review requests for information by determining whether any of the exemptions from disclosure authorized by the North Carolina Public Records Act apply to the information received or prepared
by the department in the course of carrying out its duties and responsibilities under Article 9 of Chapter 130A,

G.S. 130A-290

et seq. Department staff must also determine whether such information is subject to any of the exemptions from disclosure pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA), either by identifying whether such information
was received by a federal agency with the stipulation that it be kept confidential pursuant to a specific FOIA provision or by examining the relevant memorandum of agreement or similar document which should identify the types of documents
that the federal agency expects to be treated as confidential pursuant to FOIA. Information at issue must acquire its confidential status pursuant to federal law. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Daniel McLawhorn, Office of General
Counsel, Department of Environment and Natural Resources, 2001 N.C. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/2001).

§ 130A-305.
Construction.

This Article shall be interpreted as enabling the State to obtain federal financial assistance in carrying out its solid waste management program and to obtain the authority needed to assume primary enforcement responsibility for that portion of the solid
waste management program concerning the management of hazardous waste.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-306.
Emergency Response Fund.

There is established under the control and direction of the Department, an Emergency Response Fund which shall be a nonreverting fund consisting of any money appropriated for such purpose by the General Assembly or available to it from grants, fees, charges,
and other money paid to or recovered by or on behalf of the Department pursuant to this Article, except fees and penalties specifically designated by this Article for some other use or purpose. The Emergency Response Fund shall be
treated as a special trust fund and shall be credited with interest by the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

. The Fund shall be used to defray expenses incurred by the Department in developing and implementing an emergency hazardous waste remedial plan and to reimburse any federal, State or local agency and any agent or contractor
for expenses incurred in developing and implementing such a plan that has been approved by the Department. These funds shall be used upon a determination that sufficient funds or corrective action cannot be obtained from other sources
without incurring a delay that would significantly increase the threat to life or risk of damage to the environment. This Fund may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); money in excess of five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) shall be deposited in the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund. The Secretary is authorized to take the necessary action to recover all costs incurred by the State for site investigation and the development and implementation
of an emergency hazardous waste remedial plan, including attorney’s fees and other expenses of bringing the cost recovery action from the responsible party or parties. The provisions of

G.S. 130A-310.7

shall apply to actions to recover costs under this section except that: (i) reimbursement shall be to the Emergency Response Fund and (ii) the State need not show that it has complied with the provisions of Part 3 of
this Article.

History.
1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 74; 1989, c. 286, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 54(b).

Legal Periodicals.

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2252 (1997).

§ 130A-307.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 130A-308.
Continuing releases at permitted facilities; notification of completed corrective action.

Standards adopted under G.S. 130A-294(c) and a permit issued under G.S. 130A-294(c) shall require corrective action for all releases of hazardous waste or constituents from any solid waste management unit at a treatment, storage, or disposal facility
seeking a permit under G.S. 130A-294(c), regardless of the time at which waste was placed in such unit. Permits issued under G.S. 130A-294(c) which implement Section 3005 of RCRA (42 U.S.C. § 6925) shall contain schedules of compliance
for corrective action if corrective action cannot be completed prior to issuance of the permit and establishment of financial assurance for completing corrective action. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, this
section shall apply only to units, facilities, and permits that are covered by Section 3004(u) of RCRA (42 U.S.C. § 6924(u)). Notwithstanding the foregoing, corrective action authorized elsewhere in this Chapter shall not be limited
by this section.

The definitions set out in

G.S. 130A-310.31(b)

apply to this subsection. Any person may submit a written request to the Department for a determination that a corrective action for a release of a hazardous waste or constituents from a solid waste management unit
that is a treatment, storage, or disposal facility permitted under G.S 130A-294(c) has been completed to unrestricted use standards. A request for a determination that a corrective action at a facility has been completed to unrestricted
use standards shall be accompanied by the fee required by G.S. 130A-310.39(a)(2). If the Department determines that the corrective action at a facility has been completed to unrestricted use standards, the Department shall issue
a written notification that no further corrective action will be required at the facility. The notification shall state that no further corrective action will be required at the facility unless the Department later determines,
based on new information or information not previously provided to the Department, that the corrective action at the facility has not been completed to unrestricted use standards or that the Department was provided with false or
incomplete information. Under any of those circumstances, the Department may withdraw the notification and require responsible parties to take corrective action at a facility to bring the facility into compliance with unrestricted
use standards.

History.
1985, c. 738, s. 4; 1989, c. 168, s. 27; 1997-357, s. 4; 2001-384, s. 11; 2007-107, s. 1.1(f).

§ 130A-309.
Corrective actions beyond facility boundary.

Standards adopted under G.S. 130A-294(c) shall require that corrective action be taken beyond the facility boundary where necessary to protect human health and the environment unless the owner or operator of the facility concerned demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the Department that, despite the owner or operator’s best efforts, the owner or operator was unable to obtain the necessary permission to undertake such action. Such standards shall take effect upon adoption and shall
apply to:

All facilities operating under permits issued under G.S. 130A-294(c); and

All disposal facilities, surface impoundments, and waste pile units (including any new units, replacements of existing units or lateral expansions of existing units) which receive hazardous waste after July 26, 1982.

Pending adoption of such rules, the Department shall issue corrective action orders for facilities referred to in (1) and (2), on a case-by-case basis, consistent with the purposes of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
this section shall apply only to units, facilities, and permits that are covered by Section 3004(v) of RCRA (42 U.S.C. § 6924(v)). Notwithstanding the foregoing, corrective action authorized elsewhere in this Chapter shall
not be limited by this section.

History.
1985, c. 738, s. 4; 1989, c. 168, s. 28.

Part 2A. Nonhazardous Solid Waste Management.

§ 130A-309.01.
Title.

This Part may be cited as the Solid Waste Management Act of 1989.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to provisions for regional solid waste management authorities, see Article 22 of Chapter 153A,

G.S. 153A-421

et seq.

§ 130A-309.02.
Applicability.

This Part shall apply to solid waste other than hazardous waste and sludges.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.03.
Findings, purposes.

The General Assembly finds that:

Inefficient and improper methods of managing solid waste create hazards to public health, cause pollution of air and water resources, constitute a waste of natural resources, have an adverse effect on land values, and create public nuisances.

Problems of solid waste management have become a matter statewide in scope and necessitate State action to assist local governments in improving methods and processes to promote more efficient methods of solid waste collection and disposal.

The continuing technological progress and improvements in methods of manufacture, packaging, and marketing of consumer products have resulted in an ever-mounting increase of the mass of material discarded by the purchasers of the products, thereby necessitating
a statewide approach to assisting local governments around the State with their solid waste management programs.

The economic growth and population growth of our State have required increased industrial production together with related commercial and agricultural operations to meet our needs, which have resulted in a rising tide of unwanted and discarded materials.

The failure or inability to economically recover material and energy resources from solid waste results in the unnecessary waste and depletion of our natural resources; such that, maximum resource recovery from solid waste and maximum recycling and reuse
of the resources must be considered goals of the State.

Certain solid waste, due to its quantity; concentration; or physical, chemical, biological, or infectious characteristics; is exceptionally hazardous to human health, safety, and to the environment; such that exceptional attention to the transportation,
disposal, storage, and treatment of the waste is necessary to protect human health, safety, and welfare; and to protect the environment.

This Part should be integrated with other State laws and rules and applicable federal law.

It is the purpose of this Part to:

Regulate in the most economically feasible, cost-effective, and environmentally safe manner the storage, collection, transport, separation, processing, recycling, and disposal of solid waste in order to protect the public health, safety, and welfare;
enhance the environment for the people of this State; and recover resources which have the potential for further usefulness.

Establish and maintain a cooperative State program of planning, technical assistance, and financial assistance for solid waste management.

Require counties and municipalities to adequately plan and provide efficient, environmentally acceptable solid waste management programs; and require counties to plan for proper hazardous waste management.

Require review of the design, and issue permits for the construction, operation, and closure of solid waste management facilities.

Promote the application of resource recovery systems that preserve and enhance the quality of air, water, and land resources.

Ensure that exceptionally hazardous solid waste is transported, disposed of, stored, and treated in a manner adequate to protect human health, safety, and welfare; and the environment.

Promote the reduction, recycling, reuse, or treatment of solid waste, specifically including hazardous waste, in lieu of disposal of the waste.

Promote methods and technology for the treatment, disposal, and transportation of hazardous waste which are practical, cost-effective, and economically feasible.

Encourage counties and municipalities to utilize all means reasonably available to promote efficient and proper methods of managing solid waste and to promote the economical recovery of material and energy resources from solid waste, including contracting
with persons to provide or operate resource recovery services or facilities on behalf of the county or municipality.

Promote the education of the general public and the training of solid waste professionals to reduce the production of solid waste, to ensure proper disposal of solid waste, and to encourage recycling.

Encourage the development of waste reduction and recycling as a means of managing solid waste, conserving resources, and supplying energy through planning, grants, technical assistance, and other incentives.

Encourage the development of the State’s recycling industry by promoting the successful development of markets for recycled items and by promoting the acceleration and advancement of the technology used in manufacturing processes that use recycled items.

Give the State a leadership role in recycling efforts by granting a preference in State purchasing to products with recycled content.

Require counties to develop and implement recycling programs so that valuable materials may be returned to productive use, energy and natural resources conserved, and the useful life of solid waste management facilities extended.

Ensure that medical waste is transported, stored, treated, and disposed of in a manner sufficient to protect human health, safety, and welfare; and the environment.

Require counties, municipalities, and State agencies to determine the full cost of providing storage, collection, transport, separation, processing, recycling, and disposal of solid waste in an environmentally safe manner; and encourage counties, municipalities,
and State agencies to contract with private persons for any or all the services in order to assure that the services are provided in the most cost-effective manner.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.04.
State solid waste management policy and goals.

It is the policy of the State to promote methods of solid waste management that are alternatives to disposal in landfills and to assist units of local government with solid waste management. In furtherance of this State policy, there is established a
hierarchy of methods of managing solid waste, in descending order of preference:

Waste reduction at the source;

Recycling and reuse;

Composting;

Incineration with energy recovery;

Incineration without energy recovery;

Disposal in landfills.

It is the policy of the State to encourage research into innovative solid waste management methods and products and to encourage regional solid waste management projects.

It is the goal of this State to reduce the municipal solid waste stream, primarily through source reduction, reuse, recycling, and composting, by forty percent (40%) on a per capita basis by 30 June 2001.

, (2) Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 8.

(c1)
To measure progress toward the municipal solid waste reduction goal in a given year, comparison shall be made between the amount by weight of the municipal solid waste that, during the baseline year and
the given year, is received at municipal solid waste management facilities and is:

(1)
Disposed of in a landfill;

Incinerated;

Converted to tire-derived fuel; or

Converted to refuse-derived fuel.

(c2)
Comparison shall be between baseline and given years beginning on 1 July and ending on 30 June of the following year. The baseline year shall be the year beginning 1 July 1991 and ending 30 June 1992.
However, a unit of local government may use an earlier baseline year if it demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Department that it has sufficient data to support the use of the earlier baseline year.

(c3)
Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 8.

In furtherance of the State’s solid waste management policy, each State agency shall develop a solid waste management plan that is consistent with the solid waste management policy of the State.

(d1)
It is the policy of the State to obtain, to the extent practicable, economic benefits from the recovery from solid waste and reuse of material and energy resources. In furtherance of this policy, it is the goal
of the State to foster partnerships between the public and private sectors that strengthen the supply of, and demand for, recyclable and reusable materials and that foster opportunities for economic development from the recovery
and reuse of materials.

, (f) Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 8.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 621, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1013, s. 6; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 8.

§ 130A-309.05.
Regulated wastes; certain exclusions.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this Article, the following waste shall be regulated pursuant to this Part:

Medical waste; and

Ash generated by a solid waste management facility from the burning of solid waste.

Ash generated by a solid waste management facility from the burning of solid waste shall be disposed of in a properly designed solid waste disposal area that complies with standards developed by the Department for the disposal of the ash. The Department
shall work with solid waste management facilities that burn solid waste to identify and develop methods for recycling and reusing incinerator ash or treated ash.

Recovered material is not subject to regulation as solid waste under this Article. In order for a material that would otherwise be regulated as solid waste to qualify as a recovered material, the Department may require any person who owns or has control
over the material to demonstrate that the material meets the requirements of this subsection. In order to protect public health and the environment, the Commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection. Materials that are
accumulated speculatively, as that term is defined under 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 261 (July 1, 2014 Edition), shall not qualify as a recovered material, and shall be subject to regulation as solid waste. In order to qualify
as a recovered material, the material shall be managed as a valuable commodity in a manner consistent with the desired use or end use, and all of the following conditions shall be met:

Seventy-five percent (75%), by weight or volume, of the recovered material stored at a facility at the beginning of a calendar year commencing January 1, shall be removed from the facility through sale, use, or reuse by December 31 of the same year.

The recovered material or the products or by-products of operations that process recovered material shall not be discharged, deposited, injected, dumped, spilled, leaked, or placed into or upon any land or water so that the products or by-products or
any constituent thereof may enter other lands or be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters including groundwaters, or otherwise enter the environment or pose a threat to public health and safety. Facilities
that process recovered material shall be operated in a manner to ensure compliance with this subdivision.

The recovered material shall not be a hazardous waste or have been recovered from a hazardous waste.

The recovered material shall not contain significant concentrations of foreign constituents that render it unserviceable or inadequate for sale, or its intended use or reuse.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 9; 2015-1, s. 2(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-1, s. 2(b), effective March 16, 2015, in the introductory language of subsection (c), inserted the present next-to-last sentence, and added “the material shall be managed as a valuable commodity in a manner consistent with the desired
use or end use, and all of the following conditions shall be met” at the end of the last sentence; rewrote subdivision (c)(1); in subdivision (c)(2), deleted “and” at the end of the present next-to-last sentence, and added the present
last sentence; and added subdivision (c)(4).